hr-HR: Tehnika / bod nizanja perli: Heklanje s perlama; Vezenje perlama; Bod cigle; Cik-cak bod; Bod tratinčice; Nizanje resica od perli; Bod riblje kosti (Ndebele); Kumihimo pletenje perlama; Nizanje perlica na tkalačkom stanu; Mrežasto nizanje; Tkanje bez stana (ostalo); Peyote bod; Pravokutno tkanje (RAW); Spiralni bod; Kvadratni bod; Nizanje; Omatanje žicom s perlicama; Ostalo
tr: Boncuk işleme tekniği/dikiş: Boncuk kroşe; Boncuk işlemesi; Tuğla örgüsü; Şivron örgüsü; Papatya zinciri; Püskül boncuk işi; Balıksırtı (Ndebele); Kumihimo boncuk işleme; Tezgahta boncuk işleme; Ağ işi; Tezgah dışı dokuma (diğer); Peyote örgüsü; Dik açılı dokuma (RAW); Sarmal örgü; Kare örgü; Dizme; Boncuklu tel sarma; Diğer
fr: Technique ou point de perlage: Crochet avec perles; Broderie de perles; Point brique; Point chevron; Point marguerite; Tissage à franges; Point chevron (Ndebele); Tressage de perles Kumihimo; Tissage sur métier; Point de filet; Tissage sans métier (autre); Point peyote; Tissage à angle droit (RAW); Point spirale; Point carré; Enfilage; Enroulement de fil avec perles; Autre
it: Tecnica di lavorazione delle perline / punto: Uncinetto con perline; Ricamo con perline; Punto mattone; Punto chevron; Catenella a margherita; Frange di perline; Spina di pesce (Ndebele); Tessitura con perline Kumihimo; Lavorazione con telaio; Lavorazione a rete; Lavorazione senza telaio (altro); Punto peyote; Tessitura ad angolo retto (RAW); Punto spirale; Punto quadrato; Infilatura; Wire wrapping con perline; Altro
zh-CN: 串珠技法/针法: 串珠钩编; 串珠刺绣; 砖块针法; 人字针法; 雏菊链编织; 流苏串珠; 人字编织 (Ndebele); 组纽串珠编织; 织机串珠; 网状编织; 离机编织（其他）; 佩奥特针法; 直角编织 (RAW); 螺旋针法; 方形针法; 串珠; 绕线串珠; 其他
pt-BR: Técnica/ponto de bordado com miçangas: Crochê com miçangas; Bordado com miçangas; Ponto tijolo (brick stitch); Ponto chevron; Daisy chain; Franja de miçangas; Ponto espinha de peixe (Ndebele); Kumihimo com miçangas; Trabalho com miçangas no tear; Ponto rede; Tecelagem sem tear (outros); Ponto peyote; Trama em ângulo reto (RAW); Ponto espiral; Ponto quadrado; Encordoamento; Enrolamento de arame com miçangas; Outros
sk-SK: Technika / steh navliekania korálok: Korálkové háčkovanie; Korálkové vyšívanie; Tehlový steh; Steh chevron; Sedmokrásková retiazka; Strapcové korálkovanie; Rybia kosť (Ndebele); Korálkovanie kumihimo; Tkanie korálikov na stave; Sieťovanie; Tkanie bez stavu (iné); Peyote steh; Pravouhlý výplet (RAW); Špirálový steh; Štvorcový steh; Navliekanie; Omotávanie drôtom s korálikmi; Iné
bg-BG: Техника/бод за мъниста: Плетене на една кука с мъниста; Бродерия с мъниста; Тухлен бод; Шеврон бод; Бод тип маргаритка; Мъниста с ресни; Бод рибена кост (Ндебеле); Кумихимо с мъниста; Тъкане на мъниста на стан; Мрежовидна плетка; Тъкане на мъниста без стан (друго); Бод пейот; Правоъгълна плетка (RAW); Спираловиден бод; Квадратен бод; Низане; Увиване на тел с мъниста; Друго
hu: Gyöngyfűzési technika/öltés: Gyöngyhorgolás; Gyöngyhímzés; Téglaöltés; Chevron öltés; Százszorszép lánc; Rojtozás gyöngyökkel; Halszálka (Ndebele); Kumihimo gyöngyfűzés; Gyöngyszövés; Hálózás; Szövőkeret nélküli szövés (egyéb); Peyote öltés; Derékszögű fűzés (RAW); Spirál öltés; Négyzetes öltés; Felfűzés; Dróttekerés gyöngyökkel; Egyéb
th: เทคนิคการร้อยลูกปัด / การเย็บ: ถักโครเชต์ลูกปัด; ปักลูกปัด; ลาย Brick stitch; ลายเชฟรอน; ลายโซ่ดอกไม้ (Daisy chain); ร้อยลูกปัดแบบชายครุย; ลาย Herringbone (Ndebele); ร้อยลูกปัดคูมิฮิโมะ; การร้อยลูกปัดด้วยกี่; การร้อยแบบตาข่าย; การทอลูกปัดแบบไม่ใช้กี่ (อื่นๆ); การร้อยแบบพียอเต้; การร้อยแบบมุมฉาก (RAW); การร้อยแบบเกลียว; การร้อยแบบสี่เหลี่ยม; การร้อยเส้นเดี่ยว; การพันลวดประดับลูกปัด; อื่นๆ
es: Técnica o puntada de tejido con cuentas: Crochet con cuentas; Bordado con cuentas; Puntada de ladrillo; Puntada de chevrón; Cadena de margaritas; Creación de flecos con cuentas; Espina de pescado (Ndebele); Kumihimo con cuentas; Tejido en telar; Tejido en red; Tejido sin telar (otro); Puntada peyote; Tejido en ángulo recto (RAW); Puntada en espiral; Puntada cuadrada; Ensartado; Alambrismo con abalorios; Otro
de: Perlensticktechnik/Stich: Perlenhäkeln; Perlenstickerei; Brick Stitch; Chevron-Stich; Daisy Chain; Perlenfransen; Herringbone (Ndebele); Kumihimo mit Perlen; Perlenweben (Webrahmen); Netztechnik; Perlenweben ohne Webrahmen (Sonstige); Peyote-Stich; Right-Angle-Weave (RAW); Spiralstich; Quadratstich; Fädeln; Wire-Wrapping mit Perlen; Sonstige
nl: Rijgtechniek/steek: Kralenhaken; Kralenborduren; Baksteensteek; Chevronsteek; Daisy chain; Kralenfranjes; Herringbone (Ndebele); Kumihimo met kralen; Kralen weven op weefraam; Netsteek; Vrij kralenweven (overige); Peyotesteek; Right-angle weave (RAW); Spiraalsteek; Vierkantsteek; Rijgen; Wire wrapping met kralen; Overige
sv: Pärlteknik / stygn: Pärlvirkning; Pärlbroderi; Tegelstygn; Chevronstygn; Daisy chain; Pärlfransar; Fiskbensstygn (Ndebele); Kumihimo med pärlor; Pärlvävning; Nätning; Pärlsömnad utan väv (övrigt); Peyotesöm; Right-angle weave (RAW); Spiralsöm; Fyrkantssöm; Trädning; Trådlindning med pärlor; Övrigt
ru: Техника бисероплетения: Вязание с бисером; Вышивка бисером; Кирпичное плетение; Шевронное плетение; Плетение «ромашка»; Плетение бахромы; Плетение «елочка» (ндебеле); Плетение кумихимо с бисером; Плетение на станке; Сетчатое плетение; Плетение без станка (другое); Мозаичное плетение; Монастырское плетение (RAW); Спиральное плетение; Квадратное плетение; Нанизывание; Плетение из проволоки с бисером; Другое
vi: Kỹ thuật/mũi đính hạt: Móc hạt cườm; Thêu đính hạt; Đan kiểu xếp gạch; Đan kiểu zích zắc (Chevron); Chuỗi hoa cúc (Daisy chain); Xỏ hạt kiểu tua rua; Đan kiểu xương cá (Ndebele); Đan hạt Kumihimo; Xỏ cườm bằng khung dệt; Đan lưới; Dệt không cần khung (loại khác); Mũi khâu peyote; Kiểu đan góc vuông (RAW); Mũi khâu xoắn ốc; Mũi khâu vuông; Xỏ hạt; Quấn dây kim loại đính hạt; Khác
ro-RO: Tehnică/cusătură de broderie: Croșetare cu mărgele; Broderie cu mărgele; Cusătură tip cărămidă; Cusătură în zig-zag (chevron); Cusătură lănțișor de margarete; Franjuri cu mărgele; Herringbone (Ndebele); Kumihimo cu mărgele; Țesut la gherghef; Împletire în rețea; Țesut manual (altele); Cusătură peyote; Țesătură în unghi drept (RAW); Cusătură în spirală; Cusătură pătrată; Înșirare; Înfășurare în sârmă cu mărgele; Altele
el: Τεχνική/ραφή κοσμητικής χάντρας: Πλέξιμο χαντρών με βελονάκι; Κέντημα με χάντρες; Βελονιά τούβλου (brick stitch); Βελονιά σεβρόν; Αλυσίδα μαργαρίτας (daisy chain); Χάντρες με κρόσσια; Ψαροκόκαλο (Ndebele); Kumihimo με χάντρες; Ύφανση με αργαλειό χαντρών; Πλέξη δίχτυ; Ύφανση χωρίς αργαλειό (άλλο); Πλέξη πεγιότ; Πλέξη ορθής γωνίας (RAW); Σπειροειδής πλέξη; Τετράγωνη πλέξη; Πέρασμα σε κλωστή; Περιτύλιξη σύρματος με χάντρες; Άλλο
ja: ビーズ細工の技法／ステッチ: ビーズクロッシェ; ビーズ刺繍; ブリックステッチ; シェブロンステッチ; デイジーチェーン; フリンジビーズ; ヘリンボーン (ンデベレ); 組み紐ビーズ; ビーズ織り; ネッティング; オフルーム (その他); ペイオテステッチ; ライトアングルウィーブ (RAW); スパイラルステッチ; スクエアステッチ; ストリンギング; ビーズを使ったワイヤーラッピング; その他
pt-PT: Técnica de bordado com missangas/ponto: Croché com contas; Bordado com contas; Ponto tijolo; Ponto ziguezague (chevron); Corrente margarida; Franja de contas; Espinha de peixe (Ndebele); Trabalho com contas Kumihimo; Tecelagem em tear com missangas; Ponto de rede; Tecelagem sem tear (outro); Ponto peiote; Tecelagem em ângulo reto (RAW); Ponto em espiral; Ponto quadrado; Enfiamento; Enrolamento de arame com missangas; Outro
lt-LT: Karoliukų siuvimo technika / dygsnis: Nėrimas karoliukais; Siuvinėjimas karoliukais; Plytų raštas; Ševrono raštas; Ramunių raštas; Kutų vėrimas; Eglutės raštas („Ndebele“); „Kumihimo“ karoliukų vėrimas; Audimas staklėmis; Tinklinis pynimas; Audimas be staklių (kita); Pejoto pynimas; Stačiakampis pynimas (RAW); Spiralinis pynimas; Kvadratinis pynimas; Vėrimas; Apvyniojimas vielute su karoliukais; Kita
fi: Helmitekniikka/ommel: Helmivirkkaus; Helmikudonta; Tiilipisto; Polveikepisto; Kukkaketju; Hapsuhelmityö; Kalanruoto (Ndebele); Kumihimo-helmityö; Helmikudonta; Verkkotekniikka; Kudonta ilman kangaspuita (muu); Peyote-pisto; Suorakulmakudonta (RAW); Spiraalipisto; Neliöpisto; Pujotus; Helmien punonta metallilangalla; Muu
ko: 비즈 공예 기법/스티치: 비즈 크로셰; 비즈 자수; 브릭 스티치; 쉐브론 스티치; 데이지 체인; 프린지 비즈 공예; 헤링본(은데벨레); 쿠미히모 비즈 공예; 룸 비즈 공예; 네팅; 오프 룸 위빙(기타); 페이요트 스티치; 라이트 앵글 위브(RAW); 스파이럴 스티치; 스퀘어 스티치; 스트링; 비즈 와이어 래핑; 기타
pl: Technika / ścieg koralikowy: Szydełkowanie koralikami; Haft koralikowy; Ścieg brick (murkowy); Ścieg szewronowy; Ścieg stokrotkowy (daisy chain); Tworzenie frędzli z koralików; Ścieg jodełkowy (Ndebele); Kumihimo z koralikami; Tkanie na krośnie; Ścieg siatkowy; Tkanie bez krosna (inne); Ścieg peyote; Ścieg right-angle weave (RAW); Ścieg spiralny; Ścieg kwadratowy; Nawlekanie; Wire wrapping z koralikami; Inne
zh-TW: 串珠技巧/針法: 串珠鉤針; 串珠刺繡; 磚塊編織; 人字針法; 小雛菊編織; 流蘇串珠; 人字編織 (Ndebele); 組紐串珠; 珠機編織; 網狀編織; 徒手編織 (其他); 佩奧特編織; 直角編織 (RAW); 螺旋編織; 方形編織; 串珠; 金屬線包邊串珠; 其他
en: Beading technique / stitch: Bead crochet; Bead embroidery; Brick stitch; Chevron stitch; Daisy chain; Fringe beading; Herringbone (Ndebele); Kumihimo beading; Loom beading; Netting; Off-loom weaving (other); Peyote stitch; Right-angle weave (RAW); Spiral stitch; Square stitch; Stringing; Wire wrapping with beads; Other
nb: Perleteknikk/søm: Perlehekling; Perlebroderi; Mursteinssting; Chevron-sting; Tusenfrydkjede; Frynseperling; Fiskebeinsmønster (Ndebele); Kumihimo-perling; Perleveving; Netting; Perleveving uten vev (annet); Peyote-sting; Right-angle weave (RAW); Spiralsting; Firkantsting; Træing; Ståltrådvikling med perler; Annet
da: Perleteknik/perlesyning: Perlehækling; Perlebroderi; Murstenssting; Chevron-sting; Daisy chain; Perlefrynser; Sildeben (Ndebele); Kumihimo med perler; Perlevævning; Netsting; Vævning uden væv (andet); Peyote-sting; RAW (Right-angle weave); Spiralsting; Firkantede sting; Perletrækning; Wire wrapping med perler; Andet
sl-SI: Tehnika/šiv za perlice: Kvačkanje s perlami; Vezenje s perlami; Opečni šiv; Šiv ševron; Verižica v obliki marjetic; Nizanje resic; Ribja kost (Ndebele); Nizanje perl Kumihimo; Nizanje na statvah; Mreženje; Tkanje brez statev (drugo); Vbod peyote; Pravokotno tkanje (RAW); Spiralni vbod; Kvadratni vbod; Nizanje; Ovijanje žice s perlicami; Drugo
cs: Technika / steh na korálkování: Háčkování s korálky; Vyšívání s korálky; Cihlový steh; Chevronový steh; Kopretinový řetízek; Korálkové třásně; Herringbone (Ndebele); Korálkování Kumihimo; Tkaní na stavu; Síťování; Šití korálků (jiné); Peyote steh; Pravoúhlý steh (RAW); Spirálový steh; Čtvercový steh; Navlékání; Drátkování s korálky; Jiné